District of Columbia statutes.
42-3507.04

Relocation advisory services.

Whenever a building in the District is converted from rental to condominium units, substantially rehabilitated or demolished, or discontinued from housing use, the Relocation Assistance Office of the Department of Housing and Community Development shall provide relocation advisory services for tenants who move from the building. These services shall include:

(1)

Ascertaining the relocation needs for each household;

(2)

Providing current information on the availability of equivalent substitute housing;

(3)

Supplying information concerning federal and District housing programs; and

(4)

Providing other advisory services to displaced persons in order to minimize hardships in adjusting to relocation.

July 17, 1985, D.C. Law 6-10, § 704, 32 DCR 3089
1981 Ed., § 45-2574.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 45-2571.